North Dakota, session 69, HB1624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
School breakfast and lunch - Provided at no cost - State reimbursement.
1. A public school distric t and public schoo l shall provide one breakfast and one lunch
each school day to an enrolled student, upon request of the student, at no cost to the
student or the student's parent or guardian.
2. A nonpublic school, tribal school, public charter school, and school funded by the
bureau of Indian education may provide one breakfast and one lunch each school day
to an enrolled student, upon request of the student, at no cost to the student or the
student's parent or guardian.
3. To be eligible for reimbursement under subsection 4 for the provision of breakfasts and
lunches under subsection 1 or 2, a school district or school shall :
a. Participate in an applicable child nutrition program and food distribution program,
as defined under chapter 15.1 - 35; and
b. Encourage the parent or guardian of a student to apply for free or reduced price
school meals.
4. The superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse an eligible school district and
school for the difference between:
Page No. 1 25.1395.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. The applicable federal reimbursement rates for lunches and breakfasts, as
annually adjusted and published by the United States department of agriculture,
multiplied by the number of lunches and breakfasts served, respectively; and
b. The amount of applicable federal reimbursement actually received for providing
breakfasts and lunches.
5. If the United States department of agriculture does not publish the maximum federal
reimbursement rates, the superintendent of public instruction shall choose an
alternative equivalent inflationary measure to adjust the maximum federal
reimbursement rate under subsection 4 .
6. The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to ensure timely
implementation of this section.
7. Other laws may be enacted and rules may be adopted to facilitate, safeguard, or
implement this section, but not to hamper, restrict, or impair it. If a conflict exists
between any provision of this section and any other provision of state law, the
provisions of this section control. This section must be construed liberally to fulfill its
purposes.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 15.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
School meals fund.
There is created in the state treasury the school meals fund. The fund consists of all
moneys transferred from the strategic investment and improvements fund and transfers from
other funds as authorized by the legislative assembly. Moneys in the fund may be spent
pursuant to legislative appropriations for providing school breakfast and lunch at no cost to
students or their parents or guardians.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SCHOOL MEALS FUND - SUPERINTENDENT OF
PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - SCHOOL MEALS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
school meals fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $65,000,000, or
so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the superintendent of public instruction for the
purpose of providing school breakfast and lunch at no cost to students or their parents or
guardians, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 2 25.1395.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 4. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND TO
SCHOOL MEALS FUND. During the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and
ending June 30, 2027, the office of management and budget shall transfer the sum of
$65,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the school meals fund.
SECTION 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
Page No. 3 25.1395.05000